Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 2 Agricultural Commodity Commissions Generally
2-8-27.
Assessments to defray expenses; borrowing in anticipation of collections; use and repayment of contributions in lieu of advance deposits; collection and enforcement of assessments generally; disposition and investment of proceeds; audit.

For the purpose of providing funds to defray the necessary expenses incurred by the Commissioner or the commission in the formulation, issuance, administration, and enforcement of each marketing order issued under this article, each such marketing order shall provide for the levying and collection of assessments in sufficient amounts to defray such expenses. Each marketing order shall indicate the maximum rate of any such assessment which may be collected and the proportion, if any, payable by each producer and handler directly regulated or affected by such marketing order. In administering such marketing order, the commission shall adopt, from time to time, budgets to cover necessary expenses and the assessment rate necessary to provide sufficient funds. If the commission finds that each such budget and assessment rate are proper and equitable and will provide sufficient moneys to defray the necessary expenses, it may approve such budget and rate of assessment and order that each producer and handler so assessed shall pay to the Commissioner or the commission, at such times and in such installments as the commission may prescribe, an assessment, based upon the units in which such agricultural commodity is marketed or upon any other uniform basis which the commission determines to be reasonable and equitable, but in amounts which (1) in the case of producers will not exceed 2 1/2 percent of the gross dollar volume of sales of the commodity affected by all such producers regulated by such marketing order, or (2) in the case of processors, distributors, or other handlers will not exceed 2 1/2 percent of the gross dollar volume of purchases of the commodity affected by the marketing order from producers or of the gross dollar volume of sales of the commodity affected by the marketing order and handled by all such processors, distributors, or other handlers regulated by such marketing order during the marketing season or seasons during which such marketing order is effective.

Each marketing order which authorizes the carrying out of advertising and sales promotion plans shall provide for the levying and collection of assessments in sufficient amounts to defray the expenses of such activities. Each such marketing order shall indicate the maximum rate of any such assessment and the proportion, if any, payable by each producer and handler directly regulated or affected by such marketing order. The commission shall adopt budgets to cover such expenses and establish the assessment rate necessary to provide sufficient funds. If the commission finds that each such budget and assessment rate are proper and equitable and will provide sufficient moneys to defray such expenses, they may approve such budget and approve and levy such assessment. Any assessments so established shall be based upon the units in which such agricultural commodity is marketed or upon any other uniform basis which the commission determines to be proper and equitable. Any assessment rates established under this subsection shall be in amounts not to exceed 4 percent of the gross dollar volume of sales by all producers or by all processors, distributors, or other handlers of such agricultural commodity regulated by such marketing order during the marketing season or seasons during which such marketing order is effective.

In lieu of the assessments to defray the costs of formulation, issuance, administration, and enforcement of the marketing order and of advertising or sales promotion provided for in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, if the marketing order contains provisions for advertising or sales promotion as authorized in this article, the commission may approve and fix one assessment not exceeding 6 1/2 percent of the gross dollar volume of sales of such commodity by all producers or by all processors, distributors, or other handlers of such agricultural commodity regulated by such marketing order during the marketing season or seasons during which such marketing order is effective. The method and manner of assessment and collection thereof and the limitations and restrictions applicable thereupon shall conform in all respects with subsection (b) of this Code section, except as to the maximum amount of such assessment. In such case, the commission shall approve the proportions of such assessments which may be expended to defray the costs of formulation, issuance, administration, and enforcement of the marketing order and of such advertising or sales promotion program, provided that the proportion of such assessments which may be allocated in such manner to defray the cost of such administrative activities for such marketing order shall in no case exceed the maximum amount authorized in subsection (a) of this Code section.

In the event that any commission has reason to believe that the administration of a marketing order will be facilitated or the attainment of the purposes and objectives of the marketing order will be promoted thereby, the commission is authorized to borrow money, with or without interest, to carry out any provision of any marketing order authorized by this article and may hypothecate anticipated assessment collections applicable to such respective provisions.

In lieu of requiring advance deposits for defraying administrative or advertising and sales promotion expenses until such time as sufficient moneys are collected for such purposes from the payment of assessments established pursuant to this Code section, the Commissioner is authorized to receive and disburse for such purposes contributions made by producers, processors, distributors, or other handlers. Neither the commission nor the Commissioner shall be held responsible for the repayment of such contributions, provided that whenever collections from the payment of established assessments credited to the respective marketing order accounts are sufficient so to warrant, the commission shall recommend and the Commissioner shall repay contributions or shall authorize the application of such contributions to the assessment obligations of the persons who made such contributions.

Each and every handler of the agricultural commodities for which an assessment has been established by or pursuant to this article shall, at the time of purchase of any such commodity from the producer thereof, collect from such producer the assessment established by or in accordance with this article and remit the same to the Commissioner for the use of the commission for which the same was levied. The liability of such handler under this article shall not be discharged except upon receipt of such sums by the Commissioner. For the purpose of this subsection, to ensure compliance with this Code section, and for the administrative convenience of the Commissioner in enforcing payment and collection of such assessments, delivery by a producer to a handler for processing of any agricultural commodity upon which an assessment has been established shall be deemed a sale of such commodity within the meaning of this Code section; and the assessment shall thereupon attach and become due, regardless of whether such handler actually purchases such agricultural commodity for himself or only processes same for a consideration payable by the producer or another person and such agricultural commodity is thereafter sold to another person, provided that upon collection of such assessment by the handler to whom such agricultural commodity is so delivered for processing only, no further or additional assessment shall attach or become due by reason of the subsequent sale by such producer of such processed agricultural commodity to another person or handler.

The Commissioner may prescribe such rules as may be necessary and reasonable for the orderly reporting and transmitting of assessments by handlers and may take all legal action necessary to enforce payment of the same by handlers. The Commissioner is authorized to issue executions for the same in like manner as executions are issued for ad valorem property taxes due the state. It shall be the duty of each and every sheriff of this state and their lawful deputies, upon the request of the Commissioner, to levy and collect such executions and to make their return thereof to the Commissioner in like manner as such tax executions are levied and return thereof made to county tax collectors and tax commissioners. The Commissioner shall likewise be authorized to collect, by execution as above provided or otherwise, directly from the producer against whom any assessment levied under this Code section may be found due whenever it is determined that such producer has sold such affected commodity or commodities giving rise to such liability to a person other than to a handler who has collected such assessment and is required by this Code section to remit the same to the Commissioner. Furthermore, the Commissioner may proceed against such producer and the purchaser of such commodity simultaneously if the purchaser is a handler required to collect such assessment, until satisfaction is obtained.

Any moneys collected by the Commissioner or the commission pursuant to this article shall be deposited in a bank or other depository approved by the commission and shall be disbursed by the Commissioner only for the necessary expenses incurred by the commission and the Commissioner, as approved by the commission. Funds so collected shall be deposited and disbursed in conformity with appropriate rules and regulations prescribed by the Commissioner. All such expenditures by the Commissioner shall be audited at least annually by the state auditor and a copy of such audit shall be delivered within 30 days after the completion thereof to the Governor, the Commissioner, and the affected commission. If any such commission is abolished, any funds remaining in its hands at such time shall be used to pay the existing obligations of such commission and the expenses incurred in winding up the affairs of such commission. Any excess remaining shall escheat to the state and shall be paid by the Commissioner into the state treasury as unclaimed trust funds.

Moneys deposited by the Commissioner pursuant to this Code section which the commission determines are available for investment may be invested or reinvested by the Commissioner as provided for funds of this state or of any retirement system created by law, provided that all moneys invested shall be invested in those areas of production that will provide a return at the highest bank interest rate available. It shall be the duty of the commission annually to review these investments and determine that this Code section is complied with.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 16; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 10; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 17; Code 1981, §

2-8-19

; Code 1981, §

2-8-27

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-28.
Collection of assessments by civil action; penalty for delinquent payment.

Any assessment levied or established in accordance with this article in such specified amount as may be determined by the Commissioner or the commission pursuant to this article shall constitute a personal debt of every person so assessed and shall be due and payable to the Commissioner when payment is called for by the Commissioner. In the event of the failure of such person to pay any such assessment upon the date determined by the Commissioner, the Commissioner may file an action against such person in a court of competent jurisdiction for the collection thereof.

In the event that any producer or handler duly assessed pursuant to this article fails to pay to the Commissioner the amount so assessed on or before the date specified by the Commissioner, the Commissioner is authorized to add to such unpaid assessment an amount not exceeding 10 percent of such unpaid assessment to defray the cost of enforcing the collection of such unpaid assessment.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section with respect to collection of assessments by action are in addition to and cumulative of the provisions of this article authorizing the issuance of executions for assessments by the Commissioner. The 10 percent penalty authorized to be assessed upon delinquent assessments under subsection (b) of this Code section may likewise be included in any execution issued by the Commissioner. Such remedies may be pursued concurrently until satisfaction is obtained upon either. Any penalty recovered shall become a part of the principal assessment levied and shall be for the use of the commission entitled thereto as are other moneys received under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 20; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 14; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 21; Code 1981, §

2-8-20

; Code 1981, §

2-8-28

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-29.
Maintenance and inspection of books and records and provision of information; confidentiality of information; hearings, testimony, and subpoenas.

The Commissioner may require any and all processors or distributors subject to the provisions of any marketing order issued pursuant to this article:

To maintain books and records reflecting their operations under the marketing order;

To furnish to the Commissioner or his duly authorized or designated representatives such information as may from time to time be requested by them relating to operations under the marketing order; and

To permit inspection by the Commissioner or his duly authorized or designated representatives of such portions of such books and records as relate to operations under the marketing order.

Information obtained by any person under this Code section shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed by him to any other person, except to a person with like right to obtain the information or to any attorney employed to give legal advice thereupon or by court order.

In order to carry out the purposes of this Code section, the Commissioner may hold hearings, take testimony, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and issue subpoenas for the production of books, records, or documents of any kind.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 22; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 23; Code 1981, §

2-8-21

; Code 1981, §

2-8-29

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-30.
Use of grade or quality designations by persons not complying with order or regulations prohibited.

Whenever the use by a producer or handler of a particular emblem, label, certificate, or other distinctive designation of grade, quality, or condition, other than grade or other quality designations then in effect pursuant to state or federal grade standards, is made contingent upon compliance with certain production or handling regulations authorized by a marketing order issued and made effective under this article, it shall be unlawful and a violation of this article for any person who is not participating in and complying with such order or regulations to use such designation of grade, quality, or condition.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 18; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 12; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 19; Code 1981, §

2-8-22

; Code 1981, §

2-8-30

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-31.
Inspections; holding of commodity; warning notice; notice of noncompliance; time for correction of deficiencies; petition to divert or destroy; show cause order; disposition of noncomplying commodity; penalty provisions not waived by disposal.

Any authorized inspector or other authorized person discharging his duties in the checking of compliance with any marketing order made effective pursuant to this article may enter during normal business hours and inspect any premises, enclosure, building, or conveyance where he has reason to believe any agricultural commodity subject to a marketing order is produced, stored, being prepared for market, or marketed and may inspect or cause to be inspected such representative samples of the commodity as may be necessary to determine whether or not any lot of such commodity is in compliance with applicable regulations of any marketing order made effective pursuant to this article.

Any authorized inspector or other authorized person in the discharge of his duties, if he has reason to believe that a lot of any agricultural commodity subject to a marketing order issued under this article is not in compliance with the requirements of such marketing order or of marketing rules and regulations issued pursuant thereto, as to quality, condition, size, maturity, pack, labeling, or markings, may hold such lot for a reasonable period of time sufficient to enable such officer to ascertain by an authorized inspection whether such lot complies with such marketing requirements, but in any event not to exceed 24 hours in the case of perishables or 72 hours in the case of nonperishables, except as provided in this Code section.

Following inspection, an inspector or other authorized person may affix to any lot which is determined to be in noncompliance an official notice, warning tag, or other appropriate marking warning that the lot is held and stating the reasons therefor. It shall be unlawful for any person, other than an authorized inspector or enforcing officer, to detach, alter, deface, or destroy any such official notice, warning tag, or marking so affixed to any such lot or to remove or dispose of such lot in any manner or under conditions other than as prescribed in such notice of noncompliance, except upon written permission of an authorized enforcing officer or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

The Commissioner or the authorized person by whom such lot is being held shall serve the person in possession of such lot with a notice of noncompliance. Such notice shall be served in person or by mail to the last known address of the person in possession. It shall be the duty of the person in possession to notify the owner of the lot or other persons having an interest therein of the serving of such notice of noncompliance.

Such notice of noncompliance shall include a description of the lot and the place where and reasons for which it is held and shall cite the applicable marketing order or marketing rules and regulations and the Code section upon which the notice of noncompliance is based.

The owner of a lot shall have, in the case of a perishable commodity, not more than 48 hours and, in the case of a nonperishable commodity, not more than 72 hours from the time of the service of a notice of noncompliance for reconditioning or for the correction of the deficiencies noted in the notice of noncompliance. If such lot is reconditioned or the deficiencies are corrected, the enforcing officer shall remove the warning tags or markings and release the lot for marketing, provided that with the consent of the owner of the lot, the enforcing officer is authorized to divert the lot to other lawful uses or to destroy the lot.

If the owner of the lot fails or refuses to give consent to its diversion to other lawful uses or to its destruction or if the lot has not been reconditioned or the deficiencies otherwise corrected so as to bring the lot into compliance within the time specified in the notice, then the enforcing officer shall proceed as provided in this subsection.

The Commissioner may file a verified petition in the superior court of the county where the agricultural commodity is held or the county of the residence of the owner thereof requesting permission to divert such lot to any other available lawful use or to destroy such lot. Such verified petition shall show the condition of the lot; that the lot is situated within the territorial jurisdiction of the court in which the petition is being filed or that the owner thereof resides within the jurisdiction of the court; that the lot is held and the notice of noncompliance has been served as provided in this Code section; that the lot has not been reconditioned as required; the name and address of the owner and the person in possession of the lot; and that the owner has refused permission to divert or to destroy the lot. Upon the filing of such verified petition the court may issue an order to show cause, returnable five days after service upon the owner, why the lot shall not be reconditioned or the deficiencies corrected or why the lot shall not be diverted to other lawful uses or destroyed. The owner of the lot may, prior to the date when the order to show cause is returnable, either recondition or correct the deficiencies in the lot so as to bring the lot into compliance or file at or before the hearing on the order an answer with the court showing why the lot should not be reconditioned or the deficiencies corrected so as to bring it into compliance or showing why the lot should not be diverted to other lawful uses or destroyed.

If, at the expiration of the five days, the owner of the lot has failed or refused to recondition or to correct the deficiencies so as to bring the lot into compliance, the court may enter judgment ordering that the lot be reconditioned, diverted to any other lawful uses, or destroyed in the manner directed by the court or that the lot be relabeled, denatured, or otherwise processed or that the lot be sold or released upon such condition as the court in its discretion may impose, provided that the lot may not be sold or released into the regular channels of trade.

In the event of the sale of any lot by order of the court, the costs of storage, handling, and reconditioning or disposal shall be deducted from the proceeds of the sale and the balance, if any, shall be paid into the court for the account of the owner of any such lot.

Disposal of any lot or portion of any lot pursuant to this Code section, whether such disposal is by arrangement with an enforcing officer or by court order, shall not waive any of the penalty provisions of this article.

This Code section shall apply to any lot of any agricultural commodity regulated by a marketing order wherever or in the possession of whomever such lot may be in the marketing channels within this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, §§ 18, 19; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, §§ 12, 13; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, §§ 19, 20; Code 1981, §

2-8-23

; Code 1981, §

2-8-31

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-32.
Civil penalties; notice and hearing; recovery procedure; disposition of proceeds.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any marketing order duly issued by any commission and in effect under this article or who violates any rule or regulation issued by the Commissioner pursuant to this article or of any marketing order duly issued and effective under this article shall be civilly liable to such commission for a penalty in an amount not to exceed $500.00 for each and every violation thereof, the amount of such penalty to be fixed by the Commissioner after notice and hearing as provided by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” for contested cases and recoverable by a civil action brought in the name of the Commissioner for the use and benefit of the affected commission or by execution issued in like manner as for assessments provided by Code Section 2-8-27. Any moneys recovered pursuant to this Code section shall be deposited and disbursed in accordance with subsection (e) of Code Section 2-8-27 as are other moneys.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 18; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 12; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 19; Code 1981, §

2-8-24

; Code 1981, §

2-8-32

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-33.
Action for civil penalty or injunctive relief; costs.

The Attorney General of this state shall, upon complaint by the Commissioner, or may, upon his own initiative if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation has occurred, bring an action in the superior court in the name of the Commissioner for civil penalties or for injunctive relief, including specific performance of any obligation imposed by a marketing order or any rule or regulation issued under this article, or both, against any person violating any provisions of this article or of any marketing order or any rule or regulation duly issued by the Commissioner or any commission under this article.

If it appears to the court, upon any application for a temporary restraining order, upon the hearing of any order to show cause why a preliminary injunction should not be issued, or upon the hearing of any motion for a preliminary injunction, or if the court finds in any such action that any defendant therein is violating or has violated any provision of this article or of any marketing order or any rule or regulation duly issued by the Commissioner or any commission under this article, then the court shall enjoin the defendant from committing further violations and may compel specific performance of any obligation imposed by a marketing order or any rule or regulation issued by the Commissioner or commission under this article. It shall not be necessary in such event to allege or prove lack of an adequate remedy at law.

In any action brought by the Attorney General to enforce any of the provisions of this article or of any marketing order issued by the Commissioner or any commission and effective under this article or of any rule or regulation issued by the Commissioner or any commission pursuant to any marketing order, the judgment, if in favor of the Commissioner or the commission, may provide that the defendant pay to the Commissioner or to the commission concerned with the administration of such marketing order the costs incurred by the Commissioner or by the commission in the prosecution of such action.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 18; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 12; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 19; Code 1981, §

2-8-25

; Code 1981, §

2-8-33

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-34.
Referral for institution of legal proceedings; administrative hearing; cease and desist order.

The Commissioner on his own motion may, and upon the complaint of any interested party charging a violation of any provision of this article or of any provision of any marketing order or any rule or regulation issued by the Commissioner or commission and effective under this article shall, either refer the matter directly to the Attorney General of this state or to any prosecuting attorney of this state for the institution of legal proceedings thereupon or, if the Commissioner deems it necessary or advisable, immediately call an administrative hearing, pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” governing contested cases, to consider the charges set forth in such verified complaint.

In case the matter is referred directly by the Commissioner to the Attorney General or any prosecuting attorney, it shall be the duty of such officer, if after examination of the complaint and the evidence he believes that a violation has occurred, to bring an appropriate action or actions in a court or courts of competent jurisdiction in this state.

After an administrative hearing, if the Commissioner finds that a violation has occurred, he shall enter his findings and notify the parties to such complaint. In his discretion, the Commissioner shall either refer the matter to the Attorney General for the institution of legal proceedings or notify such parties to cease and desist from further violation. Upon the refusal or failure of such parties to comply or if he finds that the facts or circumstances warrant immediate prosecution, the Commissioner shall file a complaint with the Attorney General or with any prosecuting attorney of this state requesting that such officer commence any or all actions authorized in this article against such respondent or respondents in a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 18; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 12; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 19; Code 1981, §

2-8-26

; Code 1981, §

2-8-34

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-35.
Furnishing of false report, statement, record, or marketing order; refusal to furnish certain information.

Any person who willfully renders or furnishes a false or fraudulent report, statement, or record required pursuant to this article or any marketing order effective under this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person engaged in the handling or processing of any agricultural commodity or in the wholesale or retail trade thereof who fails or refuses to furnish, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the person from whom he has received an agricultural commodity regulated by a marketing order issued and in effect under this article and the quantity of such commodity received shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 18; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 19; Code 1981, §

2-8-27

; Code 1981, §

2-8-35

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 2.

2-8-36.
Criminal penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any provision of any marketing order duly issued by any commission under this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, §§ 18, 25; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 12; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, §§ 19, 26; Code 1981, §

2-8-28

; Code 1981, §

2-8-36

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-37.
Penalties and remedies concurrent, alternative, and cumulative.

The penalties and remedies prescribed in this article with respect to any violation mentioned shall be concurrent and alternative. Neither singly nor combined shall such penalties and remedies be exclusive; rather, either singly or combined, such penalties and remedies shall be cumulative with any and all other civil, criminal, or alternative rights, remedies, forfeitures, or penalties provided or allowed by law with respect to any such violation.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 18; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 19; Code 1981, §

2-8-29

; Code 1981, §

2-8-37

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 2.

2-8-38.
Applicability of article to retailers.

This article shall not be applicable to any retailer of agricultural commodities except to the extent that any retailer also engages in the processing or distribution of agricultural commodities as defined in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 24; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 25; Code 1981, §

2-8-30

; Code 1981, §

2-8-38

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.